Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 27

Transition Provisions

48-27-101. Application to existing domestic corporations.

Chapters 11-27 of this title apply to all domestic corporations for profit in existence on January 1, 1988, that were incorporated under any general statute of this state providing for incorporation of corporations for profit. Chapters 11-27 shall, however, not apply to corporations, the charters of which were granted by special legislative act prior to the adoption of the Constitution of 1870. Such corporations may amend their charters for any purposes consistent with chapters 11-27 of this title and in the manner set out in chapters 11-27 of this title. Such amendments and the particular rights, obligations, duties, and privileges conferred or imposed by the amendments shall be subject to § 48-11-102.

Section 48-12-102(a) does not apply to the charter of any corporation existing on January 1, 1988, unless and until a charter amendment is filed. The first charter amendment filed by a corporation following January 1, 1988, shall include any information required by § 48-12-102(a) not otherwise on file in the office of the secretary of state, except that the name and address of each incorporator may be excluded, and the information required by § 48-12-102(a)(3) shall be provided for the current registered agent and registered office. Until such a charter amendment is filed, a corporation's registered agent shall be that agent specified in the office of the secretary of state on January 1, 1988, and such corporation's registered office shall be deemed to be that office specified as the address of its registered agent unless such agent or office is changed thereafter pursuant to chapter 15 or 25 of this title.

Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (11.01 — 11.11), as amended, in effect on January 1, 1988, shall govern the rights and obligations of any shareholder who exercises the shareholder's right to dissent thereunder if the corporate action creating the right to dissent shall have been approved, by the shareholders (or by the board of directors, if no shareholder approval is required) before January 1, 1988.

Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (3.06 — 3.11), as amended, in effect on January 1, 1988, shall apply to any claims, applications, or proceedings for indemnification, or any corporate action authorizing indemnification, made or begun before January 1, 1988.

Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (12.01 — 12.12, 12.14) and Acts 1969, ch. 66, §§ 1 and 2, in effect on January 1, 1988, shall apply to any dissolution as to which a statement of intent to dissolve has been filed or a court proceeding filed before January 1, 1988.

Any domestic corporation for-profit in existence on January 1, 1988, that was incorporated under any general statute of this state providing for the incorporation of corporations for-profit may convert to a nonprofit public benefit corporation if such corporation filed a restated charter with the secretary of state on or before January 1, 1996, reciting that the corporation is a nonprofit public benefit corporation.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 17.01; 1987, ch. 273, §§ 46, 49; 1998, ch. 624, § 1.

Cross-References. Transition provisions, nonprofit corporations, title 48, ch. 68.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-706, 5-707.

48-27-102. Application to qualified foreign corporations.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on January 1, 1988, is subject to chapters 11-27 of this title, but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under chapters 11-27 of this title.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 17.02; 1987, ch. 273, § 49.

48-27-103. Saving provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the repeal of a statute by chapters 11-27 of this title does not affect:

The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal and if any certificate or document is required to be filed in any public office of this state relating to such action, it may be filed after January 1, 1988, in accordance with the prior statute; provided, that such certificate or document is received by the secretary of state or other recording official on or before April 30, 1988. Any certificate or document recorded or filed pursuant to this subdivision (a)(1) shall pay the fee required by § 48-11-303 for such recording or filing;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation, or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

Any violation of the statute, or any penalty, forfeiture, or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal; or

Any proceeding commenced, or reorganization or dissolution authorized by the board of directors, under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by chapters 11-27 of this title is reduced by chapters 11-27 of this title, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance with chapters 11-27 of this title.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 17.03; 1987, ch. 273, §§ 49, 50.